District of Columbia statutes.
34-306

Inspector of Gas and Meters to transfer books to Commission.

The Inspector of Gas and Meters provided for by law prior to March 4, 1913, shall transfer and deliver to the Commission all books, maps, papers, records, apparatus, and the property of whatsoever description in his possession, and said Commission is authorized to take possession of all books, maps, papers, records, apparatus, and property of whatsoever description.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 988, ch. 150, § 8, par. 60
1981 Ed., § 43-1006.
1973 Ed., § 43-606.